Washington statutes.
RCW 18.85.255

Licenses—Change of location.

A designated broker, managing broker, or firm shall give notice in writing to the director of any change of that licensee's business or records depository location. Upon the surrender of the original license for the business and a payment of a fee as prescribed by the director by rule, the director shall issue a new license covering the new location.

[ 2008 c 23 s 26; 1987 c 332 s 7; 1971 ex.s. c 266 s 17; 1957 c 52 s 43. Prior: 1947 c 203 s 4, part; 1945 c 111 s 7, part; 1943 c 118 s 4, part; 1941 c 252 s 18, part; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 8340-41, part; prior: 1925 ex.s. c 129 s 12, part. Formerly RCW 18.85.200.]